Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202648-1706
Application fee.

Each application shall be accompanied by a fee. The Commissioner of Labor shall establish the amount of the fee, which shall not exceed seven hundred fifty dollars, by rule and regulation. The fee shall be established with due regard for the costs of administering the Farm Labor Contractors Act. All fees so collected shall be deposited in the Contractor, Business, and Professional Employer Organization Registration Cash Fund.

Laws 1987, LB 344, § 6;

Laws 2002, LB 931, § 3;

Laws 2016, LB270, § 2;

Laws 2026, LB847, § 19.
July 18, 2026